Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF5157.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATION; RONDO COMMUNITY LAND TRUST; SMALL BUSINESS SUPPORT.new text end new text begin (a) $3,000,000 in fiscal year 2026 is appropriated from the general fund to the commissioner of employment and economic development for a grant to the Rondo Community Land Trust to provide grants and forgivable loans to small businesses located in the city of St. Paul along the University Avenue or Selby Avenue corridor. new text end new text begin (b) The Rondo Community Land Trust shall establish and administer a small business assistance program to support the stabilization, recovery, and growth of locally owned businesses operating along the University Avenue or Selby Avenue corridor. new text end new text begin (c) Grants awarded by the Rondo Community Land Trust under this section may be used for: new text end new text begin (1) commercial rent or mortgage payments; new text end new text begin (2) utility expenses; new text end new text begin (3) payroll and employee retention costs; new text end new text begin (4) equipment purchases or repairs necessary for business operations; new text end new text begin (5) inventory replacement or working capital needs; and new text end new text begin (6) other operational expenses necessary to stabilize and support small business activity. new text end new text begin (d) In awarding grants, the Rondo Community Land Trust must give priority to small businesses that: new text end new text begin (1) are locally owned and operated; new text end new text begin (2) are owned by entrepreneurs from historically underserved communities; and new text end new text begin (3) experienced financial hardship, loss of revenue, or operational disruption associated with Operation Metro Surge or other corridor disruptions along University or Selby Avenue. new text end new text begin (e) The Capitol Area Architectural and Planning Board is not an eligible recipient for a grant under this section. new text end new text begin (f) The Rondo Community Land Trust may retain up to ten percent of the appropriation for administrative costs related to the implementation, outreach, and management of the program. new text end new text begin (g) By February 1, 2027, the Rondo Community Land Trust must submit a report to the chairs and ranking minority members of the legislative committees with jurisdiction over economic development. The report must include: new text end new text begin (1) the number of businesses assisted; new text end new text begin (2) the amount and type of assistance provided; new text end new text begin (3) the geographic distribution of money; and new text end new text begin (4) a summary of outcomes related to business stabilization and corridor economic development. new text end new text begin (h) This appropriation is available until June 30, 2027. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective the day following final enactment. new text end